Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB952.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 1503 OF TITLE 74 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A DEFINITION TO READ:§ 1503. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS CHAPTER SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:* * *"METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY." A TRANSIT AUTHORITY THAT SERVES ALL OF THE TERRITORY WITHIN THE BOUNDARIES OF A COUNTY OF THE FIRST CLASS AND ALL OTHER COUNTIES LOCATED IN <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021 WHOLE OR IN PART WITHIN 20 MILES OF THE COUNTY OF THE FIRST CLASS.* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 1513 OF TITLE 74 IS AMENDED BY ADDING SUBSECTIONS TO READ:§ 1513. OPERATING PROGRAM.* * *(F.1) ADDITIONAL MINIMUM SYSTEM PERFORMANCE CRITERIA.-- (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH ADDITIONAL MINIMUM SYSTEM PERFORMANCE CRITERIA FOR AN APPLICABLE AUTHORITY TO REDUCE FARE EVASION LEAKAGE, EXPLORE PUBLIC-PRIVATE TRANSPORTATION PARTNERSHIPS AND MODERNIZE FIXED-ROUTE PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION SERVICE. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROMULGATE REGULATIONS, INCLUDING TEMPORARY REGULATIONS, TO ESTABLISH THE MINIMUM SYSTEM PERFORMANCE CRITERIA BASED UPON COMPARISON OF THE AWARD RECIPIENT TO THE AUTHORITY'S PAST PERFORMANCE AND TO THE AUTHORITY'S PEERS THAT AN AWARD RECIPIENT MUST SATISFY.(2) FAILURE OF THE APPLICABLE AUTHORITY TO SATISFY THE MINIMUM SYSTEM PERFORMANCE CRITERIA ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) SHALL RESULT IN APPLICATION OF THE PROCEDURE IN SUBSECTION (G).* * *(I) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "APPLICABLE AUTHORITY" MEANS A METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY AND THE LOCAL TRANSPORTATION ORGANIZATION ORGANIZED AND EXISTING UNDER THE ACT OF APRIL 6, 1956 (1955 P.L.1414, NO.465), KNOWN AS THE SECOND CLASS COUNTY PORT AUTHORITY ACT.* * *SECTION 3. TITLE 74 IS AMENDED BY ADDING SECTIONS TO READ:20250SB0952PN1153 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1787. Supplemental performance reporting.(a) Review.--In addition to any audits or financial statements required by the Federal or State Government or a county in this Commonwealth, the AN APPLICABLE authority shall be subject to the following performance reporting requirements:(1) At least once annually, the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee shall review the procedures and audits of the authority and produce a report on its findings.(2) The report under subsection (b) shall be made available to the public on the publicly accessible Internet website of the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee.(b) Transmission.--The Legislative Budget and Finance Committee, in collaboration with the AN APPLICABLE authority, shall present a report to the Transportation Committee of the Senate and the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives no later than February 1 of every other year. The report shall include the following:(1) The progress of the authority on achieving fiscal solvency or profitability.(2) The usage of any funds appropriated by the Commonwealth to the authority.(3) Any other information the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee deems necessary.(c) Construction.--This section shall not be construed to prohibit more frequent reviews of the AN APPLICABLE authority's use of funds appropriated.(D) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "APPLICABLE AUTHORITY" MEANS A METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1503 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS) AND THE LOCAL TRANSPORTATION ORGANIZATION ORGANIZED AND EXISTING 20250SB0952PN1153 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 UNDER THE ACT OF APRIL 6, 1956 (1955 P.L.1414, NO.465), KNOWN AS THE SECOND CLASS COUNTY PORT AUTHORITY ACT.§ 9107.1. APPLICABLE AUTHORITY. (A) DUTY TO SUBMIT PROJECTS TO BOARD.--WITHIN 90 DAYS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION, AN APPLICABLE AUTHORITY SHALL SUBMIT ONE OR MORE TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS TO THE BOARD FOR CONSIDERATION INVOLVING ONE OR MORE TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES.(B) ONGOING EXPLORATION.--BEGINNING IN CALENDAR YEAR 2027, A METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY SHALL, NO LESS THAN ANNUALLY, SUBMIT A REQUEST FOR TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS INVOLVING AT LEAST ONE TRANSPORTATION FACILITY.(C) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "APPLICABLE AUTHORITY" MEANS A METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1503 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS) AND THE LOCAL TRANSPORTATION ORGANIZATION ORGANIZED AND EXISTING UNDER THE ACT OF APRIL 6, 1956 (1955 P.L.1414, NO.465), KNOWN AS THE SECOND CLASS COUNTY PORT AUTHORITY ACT.Section 2 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0952PN1153 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718